Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2889, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2889. Homesteads, as defined in Section 2888 of this
title, are hereby classified for the purpose of taxation as provided
in Section 22 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution. All
homesteads in this state shall be assessed for taxation the same as
other real property therein, except that each homestead, as defined
by Section 2801 et seq. of this title, shall be exempted from all
Req. No. 14111 Page 1

form s of ad valorem taxation to the extent of One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00) Two Thousand Three Hundred Fifteen Dollars ($2,315.00)
of the assessed valuation. On January 1, 2032, and on January 1 of
each fifth year thereafter, the dollar amount specified in this
section shall be increased by a percentage equal to the percentage
change in the Consumer Price Index for the most recent five-year
period for which final data is available immediately preceding the
adjustment date.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2890, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 5, 1st Extraordinary Session, O.S.L.
2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 2890), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 2890. A. In addition to the amount of the homestead
exemption authorized and allowed in Section 2889 of this title, an
additional exemption is hereby granted, to the extent of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) Two Thousand Three Hundred Fifteen
Dollars ($2,315.00) of the assessed valuation on each homestead of
heads of households whose gross household income from all sources
for the preceding calendar year did not exceed Thirty Thousand
Dollars ($30,000.00). On January 1, 2032, and on January 1 of each
fifth year thereafter, the dollar amount of the exemption specified
in this section shall be increased by a percentage equal to the
percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for the most recent

Req. No. 14111 Page 2

five -year period for which final data is available immediately
preceding the adjustment date.
B. The term "gross household income" as used in this section
means the gross amount of income of every type, regardless of the
source, received by all persons occupying the same household,
whether such income was taxable or nontaxable for federal or state
income tax purposes, including pensions, annuities, federal Social
Security, unemployment payments, public assistance payments,
alimony, support money, workers' compensation, loss-of-time
insurance payments, capital gains and any other type of income
received, and excluding gifts. The term "gross household income"
shall not include any veterans' disability compensation payments or
the amount of any federal stimulus or relief payments related to the
COVID-19 virus. The term "head of household" as used in this
section means a person who as owner or joint owner maintains a home
and furnishes support for the home, furnishings, and other material
necessities.
C. The application for the additional homestead exemption shall
be made each year on or before March 15 or within thirty (30) days
from and after receipt by the taxpayer of notice of valuation
increase, whichever is later, and upon the form prescribed by the
Oklahoma Tax Commission, which shall require the taxpayer to certify
as to the amount of gross income. Upon request of the county

Req. No. 14111 Page 3

asse ssor, the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall assist in verifying the
correctness of the amount of the gross income.
D. For persons sixty-five (65) years of age or older as of
March 15 and who have previously qualified for the additional
homestead exemption, no annual application shall be required in
order to receive the exemption provided by this section; however,
any person whose gross household income in any calendar year exceeds
the amount specified in this section in order to qualify for the
additional homestead exemption shall notify the county assessor and
the additional exemption shall not be allowed for the applicable
year. Any executor or administrator of an estate within which is
included a homestead property exempt pursuant to the provisions of
this section shall notify the county assessor of the change in
status of the homestead property if such property is not the
homestead of a person who would be eligible for the exemption
provided by this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.

60-2-14111 AO 12/02/25





Req. No. 14111 Page 4